Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB118.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Section 1940-A. Office of Environmental Justice.--(a) It shall be the policy of the Commonwealth to promote and ensure that environmental justice is effectuated in this Commonwealth. Each Commonwealth agency shall make achieving environmental justice part of the agency's mission by identifying, addressing and mitigating disproportionately high and adverse human health or environmental effects of the programs, policies and activities of the agency on communities of color and low-income communities in this Commonwealth.(b) The Office of Environmental Justice is established within the department to assist in the implementation of the public policy under subsection (a).(c) The secretary shall appoint a director.(d) The office shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To advise and make recommendations to the Governor and the Governor's cabinet on:(i) Integrating environmental justice considerations throughout Commonwealth programs, regulations, policies and procedures.(ii) Improving the environment and public health in communities disproportionately burdened by environmental harms and risks.(iii) Addressing environmental justice by ensuring transparent, authentic and equitable engagement in decision making, building capacity in disproportionately burdened communities and promoting collaborative problem solving for issues involving environmental justice.(iv) Strengthening partnerships on environmental justice among governmental agencies, including Federal, State and local government.20250SB0118PN0069 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Enhancing research and assessment approaches related to environmental justice.(2) To coordinate with all Commonwealth agencies to:(i) Address and eliminate the disproportionate environmental and human health impacts on communities of color and low-income communities.(ii) Develop and enforce rules, regulations, guidance, standards, policies, plans and practices that promote environmental justice.(iii) Increase cooperation and require coordination among Commonwealth agencies in achieving environmental justice.(iv) Mitigate the inequitable distribution of the burdens and benefits of Commonwealth programs having significant impacts on human health and the environment.(v) Provide guidance regarding criteria for identifying disproportionately high and adverse human health or environmental effects on communities of color and low-income communities and the environmental impact on communities on the basis of race, color, national origin or income.(3) If appropriate, to assist all State agencies in examining new regulations and policies involving State action or the appropriation of money related to the impact those actions and resources have on environmental justice prior to adopting a regulation or policy.(4) To provide to communities of color and low-income communities greater access to public information and opportunities for participation in decision making effecting human health and the environment.(5) To receive comments, concerns and recommendations from individuals throughout the Commonwealth.20250SB0118PN0069 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) To develop resources and strategies and share relevant information with the public.(7) To examine existing data and studies relating to environmental justice.(8) To develop and update, no less than every five years, a Statewide environmental justice strategy that identifies and addresses disproportionately high and adverse human health or environmental effects of the programs, policies, spending and other activities of the Commonwealth with respect to communities of color and low-income communities, including:(i) Impacts from the lack of infrastructure or from deteriorated infrastructure.(ii) Impacts from land use.(iii) Impacts from climate change.(iv) Impacts from commercial transportation.(9) To identify programs, policies, planning and public participation processes, rulemaking, agency spending and enforcement activities relating to human health or the environment that may be revised to:(i) promote enforcement of all health, environmental and civil rights laws and regulations in communities of color and low-income communities; and(ii) improve research and data collection relating to the health and environment of communities of color and low-income communities.(10) To ensure that meaningful opportunities exist for the public to submit comments and recommendations relating to the environmental justice strategy under paragraph (8).(11) To hold public meetings or otherwise solicit public participation from communities of color and low-income 20250SB0118PN0069 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 communities for the purpose of fact-finding, policy development, receiving public comments and conducting inquiries concerning environmental justice.(12) To prepare a public review and publish a summary of the comments and recommendations.(e) (1) The secretary shall convene a task force, to be known as the Environmental Justice Task Force, which may not have more than fifteen (15) members, each of whom shall be residents of this Commonwealth, and shall include:(i) Representatives who reside or work in a community designated as an Environmental Justice Area under the Environmental Justice Public Participation Policy.(ii) Senior management officials or designees from the Governor's Office of General Counsel, the Office of Attorney General, the Department of Aging, the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Community and Economic Development, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, the Department of Education, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Transportation.(2) The task force shall have the following powers and duties:(i) To plan strategy and develop guidelines for operation of Regional Environmental Justice Committees.(ii) To prepare an annual report about the combined work of Regional Environmental Justice Committees across this Commonwealth.(iii) To monitor reporting processes for Regional Environmental Justice Committees.(3) (i) The governing body of a municipality or a resident of this Commonwealth may file a petition directly with a 20250SB0118PN0069 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Regional Environmental Justice Committee regarding adverse exposure to environmental health risks or to disproportionate adverse effects resulting from the implementation of a State law, regulation, guideline or policy affecting public health or the environment.(ii) After review of a petition under subparagraph (i) by the governing body of a municipality and an initial review of the petition by the Regional Environmental Justice Committee, the Regional Environmental Justice Committee shall meet with the governing body of the municipality to discuss the petition. The meeting shall be open to the public and the public may offer comments at the meeting.(4) Within one hundred twenty (120) days of the meeting under paragraph (3)(ii), the task force, in consultation with the governing body of the municipality, municipal residents, municipal school board of directors and county government officials, shall develop an action plan for the municipality addressing environmental factors that affect community health. The action plan shall clearly delineate the steps necessary to reduce existing environmental burdens and avoid or reduce the imposition of additional environmental burdens through allocation of resources, the exercise of regulatory discretion and the development of new standards and protections. The action plan must specify municipal deliverables, a time frame for implementation and the justification and availability of financial and other resources to implement the plan. The task force shall present the action plan to the relevant departments, recommending its implementation.(5) The task force shall monitor the implementation of each action plan and make recommendations to Commonwealth agencies as 20250SB0118PN0069 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary to facilitate implementation of the action plans. Agencies shall implement the strategy to the fullest extent practicable.(f) The Environmental Justice Advisory Board is established for purposes of reviewing and making recommendations to the director of the task force and the secretary relating to existing and proposed laws, legislation, regulations, if appropriate, and policies that impact the environmental health of communities. The board shall:(1) consist of fifteen (15) individuals appointed by the secretary;(2) meet at least quarterly;(3) annually select a chairperson from board membership; and(4) be composed of representatives from a diverse complement of sectors which may include:(i) Academic public health.(ii) Statewide environmental organizations.(iii) Civil rights and public health organizations.(iv) Large and small business and industry.(v) Municipal and county officials.(vi) Organized labor.(vii) Grassroots or faith-based community organizations.(g) As used in this section:"Board" means the Environmental Justice Advisory Board."Community of color" means any geographically distinct population with a substantial number of individuals who identify as black, African American, Hispanic, Latino, Asian, Pacific Islander or any other nonwhite race."Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection.20250SB0118PN0069 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Director" means the Director of the Office of Environmental Justice."Environmental justice" means the fair treatment and meaningful involvement of all individuals, regardless of race, color, national origin, educational level or income, with respect to the development, implementation and enforcement of environmental laws, regulations and policies to ensure that:(1) communities of color and low-income communities have access to public information and opportunities for meaningful public participation relating to human health and environmental planning, regulations and enforcement; and(2) no community of color or low-income community is exposed to a disproportionate burden of the negative human health and environmental impacts of pollution or other environmental hazards."Office" means the Office of Environmental Justice."Secretary" means the Secretary of Environmental Protection."Task force" means the Environmental Justice Task Force.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0118PN0069 - 8 - 12345678910111213141516171819